Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-288
Marketable record title; unbroken chain of title of record twenty-two years or longer; exceptions.

Any person having the legal capacity to own real estate in this state, who has an unbroken chain of title to any interest in real estate by such person and his or her immediate or remote grantors under a deed of conveyance which has been recorded for a period of twenty-two years or longer, and is in possession of such real estate, shall be deemed to have a marketable record title to such interest, subject only to such claims thereto and defects of title as are not extinguished or barred by the application of the Uniform Environmental Covenants Act and sections 25-207, 25-213, 40-104, and 76-288 to 76-298, instruments which have been recorded less than twenty-two years, and any encumbrances of record not barred by the statute of limitations.

Laws 1947, c. 243, § 1, p. 762;

Laws 2005, LB 298, § 15.

Uniform Environmental Covenants Act, see section 76-2601.

Only those persons who possess a title which complies with Marketable Title Act are qualified to invoke its aid. Smith v. Berberich, 168 Neb. 142, 95 N.W.2d 325 (1959).